Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 524.5-211, is amended to read: 524.5-211 DELEGATION OF POWER BY PARENT OR GUARDIAN. (a) A parent, legal custodian, or nonprofessional guardian of a minor or incapacitated person, by a properly executed power of attorney, may delegate to another person, for a period not exceeding one year, any powers regarding care, custody, or property of the minor or person subject to guardianship, except the power to consent to marriage or adoption of a minor person subject to guardianship. (b) A professional guardian of a minor or incapacitated person, by a properly executed power of attorney, may delegate to another person, for a period not exceeding 30 days, any powers regarding care, custody, or property of the minor or person subject to guardianship, except the power to consent to marriage or adoption of a minor person subject to guardianship. A professional guardian delegating parental rights under this paragraph must submit the power of attorney to the court. (c) A parent who executes a delegation of powers under this section must mail or give a copy of the document to any other parent within 30 days of its execution unless: (1) the other parent does not have parenting time or has supervised parenting time; or (2) there is an existing order for protection under chapter 518B or a similar law of another state in effect against the other parent to protect the parent, legal custodian, or guardian executing the delegation of powers or the child. (d) A parent, legal custodian, or guardian of a minor child may also delegate those powers by designating a standby or temporary custodian under chapter 257B. new text begin (e) An individual delegating powers under this section must be a United States citizen. new text end new text begin (f) An individual to whom any powers are delegated in paragraph (a) or (b) must not have been charged with or convicted of a crime against a minor. "Crime against a minor" means conduct that constitutes a violation of section 609.185, 609.19, 609.195, 609.20, 609.205, 609.2112, 609.2113, 609.2114, 609.215, 609.221, 609.222, 609.223, 609.342, 609.343, or 609.345, or a felony violation of section 609.377. new text end